Virginia statutes. Title 52. Police (State).
Chapter 3. Joint State and Local Police Communication System.

§ 52-16.
Governor may establish and maintain joint communication system to aid police.

The Governor may establish, purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire all necessary property, real and personal, for the purpose of establishing and maintaining a joint state and local police communication system and cause to be constructed, equipped, maintained, and operated, at such place or places as he may determine, a communication system for transmitting and receiving messages and data, in connection with the work of the police departments of, and officers exercising police powers in, the cities, towns, and counties of the Commonwealth and the work of the police officers of the Department of State Police, relating to the detection of crime, the apprehension of criminals, emergency management and response, information relating to criminal activity, and other necessary police activities.

History.

1936-7, p. 44; Michie Code 1942, § 2991b; 2022, c. 49.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 49 rewrote the section, which read: “The Governor may in his discretion establish, purchase, lease or otherwise acquire all necessary property, real and personal, for such purpose , and cause to be constructed, equipped, maintained and operated, at such place or places as he may determine, a radio or teletype system or any combination of the two for transmitting and receiving messages, in connection with the work of the police departments of, and officers exercising police powers in, the cities, towns and counties of Virginia and the work of the police officers of the Department of State Police, relating to the detection of crime and the apprehension of criminals and other necessary police activities.”

§ 52-17.
Contracts with counties, cities, and towns.

In order to make the communication system effective and of greatest benefit to the people of the Commonwealth, the Governor may enter into negotiations with and make contracts and agreements with the counties, cities, and towns of the Commonwealth whereby portions of the cost of establishing, purchasing, constructing, maintaining, and operating such system will be borne by such localities.

In making agreements with the several localities, due consideration shall be given to the population thereof and to any expense incurred, or which may be incurred, by such localities in purchasing, constructing, maintaining, and operating local systems for similar purposes.

History.

1936-7, p. 45; Michie Code 1942, § 2991b; 2022, c. 49.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 49 in the first paragraph, inserted “communication” and deleted “in his discretion” preceding “enter”; and made stylistic changes.

§ 52-18.
Districts.

The Governor may divide the Commonwealth into two or more communication system districts, and, in the event of the proper proportionate monetary cooperation upon the part of localities within any one or more of such districts, may arrange for the establishment, purchase, installation, maintenance, and operation of such communication system equipment within such district or districts.

History.

1936-7, p. 45; Michie Code 1942, § 2991b; 2022, c. 49.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 49 deleted “in his discretion” following “The Governor may,” “or combination of the two” following the first occurrence of “districts,” and “or both” following “equipment”; and substituted “communication system” for “radio or teletype” twice.

§ 52-19.
Rules and regulations.

The Governor may make and issue reasonable rules and regulations as he may deem necessary for the proper use of such communication system.

History.

1936-7, p. 45; Michie Code 1942, § 2991b; 2022, c. 49.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 49 substituted “make and issue” for “cause to be made and issued such”; and inserted “communication.”